Hawaii, session 2025, HB1223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $113,914,843.20 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the thirty-eighth representative district, as follows: 1.  Kipapa elementary school, Oahu A.  Design and construction for a new playground. Design                                 $30,000 Construction                           $300,000 Total funding                     $330,000 B.  Plans, design, and construction for installation of security screens in building K. Plans and design                       $13,000 Construction                           $130,000 Total funding                     $143,000 C.  Plans, design, and construction to repaint the exterior of building L. Plans and design                       $17,400 Construction                           $174,000 Total funding                     $191,400 D.  Plans, design, and construction to replace the campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Plans and design                       $200,000 Construction                           $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,200,000 E.  Plans, design, and construction for installation of ceiling fans across campus. Plans and design                       $18,000 Construction                           $180,000 Total funding                     $198,000 F.  Plans, design, and construction for reroofing of P-15, P-16, P-17, and P-21. Plans and design                       $13,000 Construction                           $130,000 Total funding                     $143,000 2.  Mililani high school, Oahu A.  Construction of a career and technical education building. Total funding                     $19,000,000 B.  Construction of a swimming pool. Total funding                     $20,000,000 C.  Construction of a performing arts center. Total funding                     $52,000,000 3.  Mililani Ike elementary school, Oahu A.  Design and construction of a campus DDC replacement building. Design                                 $30,000 Construction                           $300,000 Total funding                     $330,000 B.  Plans, design, and construction to resurface the cafeteria parking area of building C. Plans and design                       $20,000 Construction                           $200,000 Total funding                     $220,000 C.  Plans, design, and construction to repaint the exterior of building A. Plans and design                       $14,000 Construction                           $140,000 Total funding                     $154,000 D.  Plans, design, and construction to repaint the exterior of building C. Plans and design                       $18,000 Construction                           $180,000 Total funding                     $198,000 E.  Plans, design, and construction for drainage improvements on portable buildings. Plans and design                       $17,500 Construction                           $175,000 Total funding                     $192,500 F.  Plans, design, and construction to reconstruct the kitchen refrigerator and freezer in building C. Plans and design                       $20,000 Construction                           $200,000 Total funding                     $220,000 G.  Plans, design, and construction to replace the program bell campus wide. Plans and design                       $48,000 Construction                           $480,000 Total funding                     $528,000 H.  Plans, design, and construction for new playground equipment. Plans and design                       $20,000 Construction                           $200,000 Total funding                     $220,000 4.  Mililani Waena, Oahu A.  Design and construction for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Design                                 $200,000 Construction                           $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,200,000 B.  Plans, design, and construction to repair and replace fencing on the rear part of campus. Plans and design                       $12,000 Construction                           $120,000 Total funding                     $132,000 C.  Plans, design, and construction for phase 2 of campus wide structural repairs. Plans and design                       $30,000 Construction                           $300,000 Total funding                     $330,000 D.  Plans, design, and construction to replace existing waterline. Plans and design                       $17,000 Construction                           $170,000 Total funding                     $187,000 E.  Plans, design, and construction for playground equipment. Plans and design                       $25,000 Construction                           $250,000 Total funding                     $275,000 5.  Mililani Mauka elementary school, Oahu A.  Design and construction for replacement of air conditioning equipment in building A. Design                                 $90,000 Construction                           $900,000 Total funding                     $990,000 B.  Plans, design, and construction for replacement of campus wide fire alarm system including system monitoring. Plans and design                       $200,000 Construction                           $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,200,000 C.  Plans, design, and construction to replace skylights and storm louvers in buildings B and C. Plans and design                       $25,000 Construction                           $250,000 Total funding                     $275,000 D.  Plans, design, and construction to resurface the driveway and parking lot. Plans and design                       $90,000 Construction                           $900,000 Total funding                     $990,000 E.  Plans, design, and construction to repair campus wide irrigation system. Plans and design                       $15,000 Construction                           $150,000 Total funding                     $165,000 F.  Plans, design, and construction for a school-wide renovation. Plans and design                       $161,700 Construction                           $1,617,000 Total funding                     $1,778,700 6.  Mililani middle school, Oahu A.  Design and construction for replacement of campus wide fire alarm system including system monitoring. Design                                 $20,000 Construction                           $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,020,000 B.  Plans, design, and construction for replacement of air conditioning chiller unit in building D. Plans and design                       $22,000 Construction                           $220,000 Total funding                     $242,000 C.  Plans, design, and construction for concrete walkway repairs between buildings G, E, and A. Plans and design                       $26,000 Construction                           $260,000 Total funding                     $286,000 D.  Plans, design, and construction for air conditioner efficiency replacement. Plans and design                       $109,031.20 Construction                           $1,090,312 Total funding                     $1,199,343.20 E.  Plans, design, and construction for replacement of exterior soffits in building E. Plans and design                       $30,000 Construction                           $300,000 Total funding                     $330,000 F.  Plans, design, and construction to replace exterior soffits in building C. Plans and design                       $30,000 Construction                           $300,000 Total funding                     $330,000 G.  Plans, design, and construction for waterproofing the playcourt wall. Plans and design                       $20,000 Construction                           $200,000 Total funding                     $220,000 H.  Plans, design, and construction for replacement of folding doors on building F. Plans and design                       $20,000 Construction                           $200,000 Total funding                     $220,000 I.  Plans, design, and construction for resurfacing the basketball court. Plans and design                       $29,500 Construction                           $295,500 Total funding                     $324,500 7.  Mililani Uka elementary school, Oahu A.  Design and construction for the installation of ceiling fans across campus. Design                                 $15,000 Construction                           $150,000 Total funding                     $165,000 B.  Plans, design, and construction to replace the existing waterline. Plans and design                       $14,000 Construction                           $140,000 Total funding                     $154,000 C.  Plans, design, and construction to replace the irrigation system campus wide. Plans and design                       $15,000 Construction                           $150,000 Total funding                     $165,000 D.  Plans, design, and construction to resurface the concrete parking lot. Plans and design                       $14,400 Construction                           $144,000 Total funding                     $158,400 E.  Plans, design, and construction to replace the campus fire alarm system, including system monitoring. Plans and design                       $200,000 Construction                           $2,000,000 Total funding                     $2,200,000 F.  Plans, design, and construction to reroof P-6, P-7, and P-12. Plans and design                       $10,000 Construction                           $100,000 Total funding                     $110,000 SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________